Washington statutes.
RCW 19.170.060

Damages—Penalties.

(1) A person who suffers damage from an act of deceptive promotional advertising may bring an action against the sponsor or promoter of the advertising, or both. Damages include, but are not limited to, fees paid in violation of RCW 19.170.030(6) and the dollar value of a prize represented to be awarded to a person, but not received by that person.

(2) In an action for deceptive promotional advertising, the court may award the greater of five hundred dollars or three times the actual damages sustained by the person, not to exceed ten thousand dollars; equitable relief, including, but not limited to an injunction and restitution of money and property; attorneys' fees and costs; and any other relief that the court deems proper.

[ 1991 c 227 s 6.]